Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 9. Theft of Identity

§ 6-3-901.
Unauthorized use of personal identifying information; penalties; restitution.

Every person who willfully obtains personal identifying information of another person, and uses that information for any unlawful purpose, including to obtain, or attempt to obtain, credit, goods, services or medical information in the name of the other person without the consent of that person is guilty of theft of identity.

As used in this section “personal identifying information” means the name or any of the following data elements of an individual person:

Address;

Telephone number;

Social security number;

Driver’s license number;

Account number, credit card number or debit card number in combination with any security code, access code or password that would allow access to a financial account of the person;

Tribal identification card;

Federal or state government issued identification card;

Shared secrets or security tokens that are known to be used for data based authentication;

A username or email address, in combination with a password or security question and answer that would permit access to an online account;

A birth or marriage certificate;

Medical information, meaning a person’s medical history, mental or physical condition, or medical treatment or diagnosis by a health care professional;

Health insurance information, meaning a person’s health insurance policy number or subscriber identification number, any unique identifier used by a health insurer to identify the person or information related to a person’s application and claims history;

Unique biometric data, meaning data generated from measurements or analysis of human body characteristics for authentication purposes;

An individual taxpayer identification number.

Theft of identity is:

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if no economic benefit was gained or was attempted to be gained, or if an economic benefit of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) was gained or was attempted to be gained by the defendant; or

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if an economic benefit of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more was gained or was attempted to be gained by the defendant.

If a restitution plan is ordered pursuant to W.S.

7-9-101

through

7-9-115

, the court may include, as part of its determination of amount owed pursuant to W.S.

7-9-103

, payment for any costs incurred by the victim, including attorney fees, any costs incurred in clearing the credit history or credit rating of the victim or in connection with any civil or administrative proceeding to satisfy any debt, lien or other obligation of the victim arising as a result of the actions of the defendant.

In any case in which a person willfully obtains personal identifying information of another person, and without the authorization of that person uses that information to commit a crime in addition to a violation of subsection (a) of this section, and is convicted of that crime, the court records shall reflect that the person whose identity was falsely used to commit the crime did not commit the crime.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 175, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2004, ch. 126, § 1; 2005, ch. 130, § 2; 2015 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to civil liability for the theft of identity, see §

1-1-128

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c)(i) and (ii), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00).”

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), inserted “tribal identification card number.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (b), which formerly read: “As used in this section ‘personal identifying information,’ means the name, address, telephone number, driver's license number, social security number, place of employment, employee identification number, tribal identification card number, mother's maiden name, demand deposit account number, savings account number, or credit card number of an individual person.”

Misdemeanor conviction. —

Nothing supported a conclusion that defendant sought to enhance his financial well-being in the initial criminal case, and his conviction for felony identity theft could not stand; however, the felony conviction was set aside and the Wyoming Supreme Court ordered entry of a misdemeanor identity theft conviction, and remanded to the district court for resentencing.
Rodgers v. State, 2011 WY 158, 265 P.3d 235,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited

in

Dave v. Valdez, 2012 WY 59, 275 P.3d 485,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Apr. 13, 2012); Allaback v. State, 2014 WY 27,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Feb 24, 2014); Allaback v. State, 2014 WY 27,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Feb 24, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes relating to offense of identity theft, 125 A.L.R.5th 537.

§ 6-3-902.
Unlawful impersonation through electronic means; penalties; definitions; civil remedies.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both, if he knowingly and without consent intentionally impersonates another person or that person’s personal or organizational digital identity through, or on, an internet website or by other electronic means, including, but not limited to spoofing, and:

Causes or attempts to cause harm;

Harasses or attempts to harass another person while using false self-identifying information related to the person impersonated; or

Uses or attempts to use false self-identifying information related to the person impersonated as an unauthorized deceptive means to facilitate contact with another person.

For purposes of this section:

“Electronic means” includes opening an e-mail account or an account or profile on a site transmitted via the internet;

“Internet” means as defined in W.S. 9-2-3219(a)(iii);

“Spoofing” means falsifying the name or phone number appearing on caller identification systems;

“Personal digital identity” means as defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xviii);

“Organizational digital identity” means as defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xix).

In addition to any other civil remedy available, a person who suffers damage or loss by reason of a violation of subsection (a) of this section may bring a civil action against the violator for compensatory damages and injunctive relief or other equitable relief.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 180, § 1; 2018 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 17, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, rewrote the existing language, which read: “Any person who knowingly and without consent intentionally impersonates another actual person through, or on, an internet website or by other electronic means, including, but not limited to spoofing and causes or attempts to cause harm, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both,” and redesignated it as (a); and added (a)(i) through (a)(iii).

The 2021 amendment

substituted “9-2-3219(a)(iii)” for “9-2-1035(a)(iii)” in (b)(ii).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “or that person's personal or organizational digital identity” in the introductory language of (a); and added (b)(iv) and (b)(v).

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 180, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.